Louisiana, session 2026, SB516.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2115.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2115.34. Licensure requirements of hospitals that provide emergency services
A. No hospital license shall be issued or be renewed on or after January
1, 2027, without meeting the following requirements:
(1) Each hospital shall maintain a minimum of thirty inpatient hospital
beds.
(2) Each hospital shall maintain a minimum of fifteen emergency
department beds.
(3) Each hospital shall fully comply with the requirements of the federal
Emergency Treatment and Active Labor Act of 1986 (EMTALA), and its
implementing regulations, regardless of whether the hospital accepts
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1255 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 516
remuneration from Medicare.
B. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to the following
hospitals:
(1) A hospital that is an off-site campus of a main hospital campus.
(2) A hospital designated as a critical access hospital under federal law.
(3) A rural hospital as defined by R.S. 40:1189.3.
(4) A physician-owned hospital that does not provide twenty-four hour
emergency medical services.
(5) A hospital that is owned or operated by a city, parish, or other
political subdivision of the state of Louisiana.